South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S127.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 9-11-10(17) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (17) "Employer" means: (a) the State; (b) a political subdivision, agency, or department of the State which employs police officers and which has been admitted to the system as provided in Section 9-11-40;  and (c) a service organization, the membership of which is composed solely of persons eligible to be members as defined by this section, if the compensation received by the employees of the service organization is provided from monies paid by the members as dues, or otherwise, or from funds derived from public sources and if the contributions prescribed by this chapter are to be paid from the funds of the service organization.; and (d) the Catawba Nation upon its admission to the system as provided in Section 9-11-43. SECTION 2.  Chapter 11, Title 9 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 9-11-43. (A) The Catawba Nation may become an employer for the purposes of this chapter by applying to the board for admission to the system pursuant to Section 9-11-40, complying with the requirements of Section 9-11-40, and complying with the board's rules and regulations. The application must set forth the requested date of admission, which must be the January first, the April first, the July first, or the October first next following receipt by the board of the application. (B) An employee of the Catawba Nation may not become a member of the system unless substantially all of the employee's time is devoted solely to the performance of governmental service as a police officer pursuant to Section 27-16-70(C). (C) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, as a condition to joining the system, the Catawba Nation agrees to be subject to all of the state laws, regulations, administrative policies, and plan provisions related to the administration and enforcement of the requirements of the system and agrees that any and all disputes arising pursuant to or by virtue of its participation in the system will be resolved in the appropriate state court or administrative tribunal, notwithstanding any sovereign immunity that might otherwise apply. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to affect, modify, diminish, or otherwise impair any sovereign immunity enjoyed by the Catawba Nation with respect to any other provision of state law unrelated to the administration and enforcement of the requirements of the system. SECTION 3.  Article 1, Chapter 11, Title 9 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 9-11-28. (A) After December 31, 2025, any person who is a full-time master-in-equity shall participate in the South Carolina Police Officers Retirement System for his service as a master-in-equity. (B) From July 1, 2025, to January 1, 2026, a full-time master-in-equity who elects to transfer credited service received under the South Carolina Retirement System to the South Carolina Police Officers Retirement System may do so upon payment of the accumulated employer and employee contributions and interest in the South Carolina Retirement System plus five percent of his annual salary in effect as of June 30, 2025, for each year of service prorated for periods of less than a year. After January 1, 2026, a master-in-equity may elect to transfer credited service received under the South Carolina Retirement System to the South Carolina Police Officers Retirement System as provided in Section 9-11-40(9). SECTION 4.  Section 9-11-90(4)(a)(ii) of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (D) the member has not been engaged to perform services for a participating employer in the system or any other system provided in this title for compensation in any capacity, whether as an employee, independent contractor, leased employee, joint employee, or other classification of worker, for a period of at least twelve consecutive months subsequent to retirement. The exemption provided under this subitem does not apply unless the member first certifies to the system that he satisfies the requirements for the exemption. If a member inaccurately certifies that he satisfies the requirements for the exemption provided in this subitem, the member is responsible for reimbursing the system for any benefits wrongly paid to the member; or (E) compensation received by the retired member from the covered employer is for employment in a critical needs law enforcement position as determined by the Law Enforcement Training Council.  For the provisions of this subitem to apply, the Law Enforcement Training Council must review and approve, from the documentation provided by the covered employer, that no qualified, nonretired member is available for employment in the position, and that the member selected for employment meets the requirements of this subitem.  No later than January 1, 2026, and each January first thereafter, the Law Enforcement Training Council must submit a report to the Chairman of the Senate Finance Committee and the Chairman of the House Ways and Means Committee of the positions requested for inclusion in the earnings limitation exception under this subitem for the following fiscal year.  Effective July 1, 2026, and each July first thereafter, the earnings limitation exception provided in this subitem only applies to those positions approved by action of the General Assembly for the fiscal year in response to the report submitted by the Law Enforcement Training Council. The Law Enforcement Training Council shall develop guidelines and curriculum for these officers to be recertified and may not require recertification through basic training for those that have been inactive for a year or more. SECTION 5.  Section 9-1-1790(A)(2) of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (d) the member has not been engaged to perform services for a participating employer in the system or any other system provided in this title for compensation in any capacity, whether as an employee, independent contractor, leased employee, joint employee, or other classification of worker, for a period of at least twelve consecutive months subsequent to retirement. The exemption provided under this subitem does not apply unless the member first certifies to the system that he satisfies the requirements for the exemption. If a member inaccurately certifies that he satisfies the requirements for the exemption provided in this subitem, the member is responsible for reimbursing the system for any benefits wrongly paid to the member. SECTION 6.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----